Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB761.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before the owner of a motor vehicle may operate it or permit its operation upon a
highway, the owner shall apply for registration in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated by the cabinet, except that a person who purchases a motor
vehicle, or brings a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall
make application for registration within fifteen (15) days. The bill of sale or
assigned title must be in the motor vehicle during this fifteen (15) day period. If the
owner of a motor vehicle is an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the
motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which he or
she resides. If the owner of a motor vehicle does not reside in the Commonwealth,
the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which
the motor vehicle is principally operated. If the owner of a motor vehicle is other
than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be
registered with the county clerk of either county. The application when presented to
the county clerk for registration shall be accompanied by:
(a) A bill of sale and a manufacturer's certificate of origin if the application is for
the registration of a new motor vehicle;
(b) The owner's registration receipt, if the motor vehicle was last registered in this
state;
(c) A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt, if last registered in another
state where the law of that state does not require the owner of a motor vehicle
to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;
(d) A certificate of title, if last registered in another state where the law of that
state requires the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or
ownership;
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
(e) An affidavit from an officer of a local government saying that the motor
vehicle has been abandoned and that the provisions of KRS 82.630 have been
complied with, for local governments which elect to use the provisions of
KRS 82.600 to 82.640; and
(f) The application from a person who has brought a motor vehicle into the
Commonwealth from another state shall be accompanied by proof that the
motor vehicle is insured in compliance with KRS 304.39-080.
(2) After that, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the owner of any
motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(1) or (2) shall register his or her motor
vehicle on or before the date on which his or her certificate of registration expires.
If, before operating the motor vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some
later date and pays the fee for the full year, he or she will be deemed to have
complied with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk
shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet.
(3) After that, the owner of any commercial vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(3)
to (14) shall register the commercial vehicle on or before April 1 of each year. If,
before operating a commercial vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some
later date and pays the required fee, he or she will be deemed to have complied with
the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be
deemed to be registration with the cabinet, except the owner of any commercial
motor vehicle to be registered pursuant to the International Registration Plan under
KRS 186.050(13) shall register the commercial motor vehicles on or before the last
day of the month of registration established pursuant to KRS 186.051(3).
(4) The application and documents presented therewith, including the sheriff's
certificate of inspection, shall be affixed to the Transportation Cabinet copy of the
certificate of title or registration and sent to the Transportation Cabinet by the clerk.
(5) At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of registration of any motor
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
vehicle previously registered in the Commonwealth as provided by KRS 186A.035,
the owner of the vehicle shall be notified by mail on the same notice required by
KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. In addition, the department shall provide
appropriate forms and information to permit renewal of motor vehicle registration
to be completed by mail. Any registration renewal by mail shall require payment of
an additional two dollar ($2) fee which shall be received by the county clerk.
Nonreceipt of the notice herein shall not constitute a defense to any registration
related offense.
(6) (a) If an individual has been serving in the Armed Forces of the United States,
National Guard, or Reserves[ military] stationed or assigned to a base or
other location outside the boundaries of the United States, he or she shall
renew the registration on the vehicle within thirty (30) days of his or her
return if:
1. The motor vehicle[ has been stored on a military base during the time of
deployment and] has not been operated on the public highways during
that time; and
2. The vehicle's registration expired during the individual's absence.
(b) An individual who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
not be convicted or cited for driving a vehicle with expired registration within
thirty (30) days after the individual's return to the Commonwealth if the
individual can provide proof of meeting the eligibility criteria under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(c) When an individual presents evidence of meeting the criteria under paragraph
(a) of this subsection when applying to renew the registration on the motor
vehicle, the county clerk shall, when applicable, treat the registration as a
prorated renewal under KRS 186.051, and charge the individual a registration
fee only for the number of months of the registration year the vehicle will be
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
used on the public highways.
(7) If an individual has been serving in the Armed Forces of the United States,
National Guard, or Reserves stationed or assigned to a base or other location
outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth, he or she may renew their motor
vehicle registration for the following year, up to two hundred eighty (280) days
prior to the expiration of the motor vehicle registration if:
(a) He or she will be outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth when the
current motor vehicle registration expires; and
(b) The applicant supplies the clerk military orders documenting the need for
early motor vehicle registration due to the applicant's military obligations.
(8)[(7)] The provisions of this section shall not apply to vehicles for which permanent
registration has been obtained pursuant to KRS 186A.127.
Section 2. KRS 186.416 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If a resident of the Commonwealth currently serving in the Armed Forces of the
United States, National Guard, or Reserves [military ]is stationed or assigned to a
base or other location outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth, the resident, or
the resident's spouse or dependents, may:
(a) Update his or her license electronically or by mail to include a motorcycle
operator's endorsement on an existing operator's license;
(b) Renew his or her license up to two hundred eighty (280) days prior to the
expiration of the operator's license, if he or she will be outside the
boundaries of the Commonwealth at the time the current operator's license
expires, and he or she supplies the clerk or the cabinet military orders
documenting the need for early operator's license renewal due to the
applicant's or applicant's spouse's military obligations; or
(c)[(b)] Renew a Class D operator's license issued under this section by mail. If
the resident, or his or her spouse or dependents, was issued an "under 21"
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
operator's license, upon the date of the license holder's twenty-first birthday,
the "under 21" operator's license may be renewed for an operator's license that
no longer contains the outdated reference to being "under 21."
(2) A resident of the Commonwealth renewing an operator's license by mail under
subsection (1) of this section may have a personal designee apply to the cabinet on
behalf of the resident to renew the resident's operator's license. An operator's
license for which an endorsement is being added electronically or by mail, or which
is being renewed by mail under subsection (1) of this section shall be issued a
license bearing the applicant's historical photo if there is a photo on file. If there is
no photo on file, the license shall be issued without a photograph and shall show in
the space provided for the photograph the legend "valid without photo and
signature."
(3) (a) 1. If a resident of the Commonwealth has been serving in the Armed
Forces of the United States[ military], National Guard, or Reserves
stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries
of the Commonwealth and has allowed his or her operator's license to
expire, he or she shall, within ninety (90) days of returning to the
Commonwealth, be permitted to renew his or her license without having
to take a written test or road test.
2. The spouse or dependent of a person identified in subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph shall be afforded the same consideration identified in that
subparagraph regarding the renewal of an expired operator's license.
(b) A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not
be convicted or cited for driving on an expired license prior to license renewal
during the ninety (90) days after the person's return to the Commonwealth if
the person can provide proof of his or her out-of-state service and dates of
assignment.
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
(c) A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection and who
does not renew his or her license within ninety (90) days of returning to the
Commonwealth shall be required to comply with the provisions of this
chapter governing renewal of a license that has expired.
(d) If a resident of the Commonwealth has been issued an "under 21" or "under
21 CDL" operator's license and the person is unable to renew the license on
the date of his or her twenty-first birthday, the "under 21" or "under 21 CDL"
operator's license shall be valid for ninety (90) days beyond the date of the
person's twenty-first birthday.
(4) (a) Any person who served in the active Armed Forces of the United States,
including the Coast Guard, and any member of the National Guard or Reserve
Component who completed the member's term of service and was released,
separated, discharged, or retired therefrom under either an honorable
discharge or a general under honorable conditions discharge may, at the time
of initial application or application for renewal or duplicate, request that an
operator's license or a personal identification card issued under this chapter
bear the word "veteran" on the face or the back of the license or personal
identification card.
(b) The designation shall be in a style and format considered appropriate by the
Transportation Cabinet. Prior to obtaining a designation requested under this
subsection, the applicant shall present to the cabinet as proof of eligibility, an
original or copy of his or her:
1. Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification
Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
2. DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, DD-257, or NGB-22 form; or
3. Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United
States Department of Defense.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1930
The cabinet shall not be liable for fraudulent or misread forms presented.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish forms and procedures for facilitating the addition of a
motorcycle endorsement to an existing operator's license, both electronically and by
mail, in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/19/2025 1:06 PM Jacketed